Illinois, session 104th, HB1800.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 1-5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/1-5)7    Sec. 1-5. Purpose. It is the the purpose of this Act to 8provide for the creation of the Department of Human Services 9and to transfer to it certain rights, powers, duties, and 10functions currently exercised by various other agencies of 11State Government. This Act consolidates and centralizes 12certain human services programs that are now offered to the 13citizens of this State by a number of different State 14agencies; it is intended to make possible the more effective 15and efficient operation of the affected programs and services.16(Source: P.A. 89-507, eff. 7-3-96.)